Wisconsin, session 2025, SB956.
do enact as follows:SB956,13Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.SB956,1,44(1) Internet crimes against children positions. SB956,2,25(a) Criminal analyst positions. The authorized FTE positions for the 6department of justice are increased by 2.0 GPR Internet crimes against children 1criminal analyst positions, to be funded from the appropriation under s. 20.455 (2) 2(a).SB956,2,63(b) Outreach specialist position. The authorized FTE positions for the 4department of justice are increased by 1.0 GPR Internet crimes against children 5outreach specialist position, to be funded from the appropriation under s. 20.455 (2) 6(a).SB956,2,107(c) Digital evidence examiner position. The authorized FTE positions for the 8department of justice are increased by 1.0 GPR Internet crimes against children 9digital evidence examiner position, to be funded from the appropriation under s. 1020.455 (2) (a).SB956,2,1111